South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S583.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 40-19-250 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 40-19-250. (A) The board shall develop in regulation a continuing education program and each licensee must attend a minimum of four credit hours annually, of which one credit hour must be an ethics in funeral service course.  This continuing education program must be offered, at a minimum, four times a year at locations easily accessible to participants.  Three of the four required hours must be available through correspondence courses, with at least two of the four hours requiring the physical attendance of the licensee.Physical attendance of a licensee is required for two of the four required hours but is not required for the remaining two required hours. (B) For purposes of this section, "physical attendance": (1) means being physically present in person on the site of a designated physical location to receive continuing education instruction; and (2) excludes virtual, remote, correspondence, or other instructional formats that do not satisfy the requirements of item (1). (C) This continuing education requirement does not apply to a person who is not the manager of record of a funeral home, funeral establishment, or mortuary if the person has been licensed for thirty or more years and is sixty years old or older. (D) The provisions of subsection (A) relating to physical attendance do not apply if there is a declaration of a pandemic or if a natural disaster has occurred. Virtual, remote, correspondence, or other instructional formats are permitted during a pandemic or natural disaster. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect on July 1, 2026. ----XX----